Colorado, session 2026A, HB1404.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-22-117, add
(2)(c)(V) as follows:
24-22-117. Tobacco tax cash fund - accounts - creation -
legislative declaration - repeal.
(2) There are created in the state treasury the following funds:
(c) (V) (A) ON JUNE 30, 2027, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL
TRANSFER FROM THE TOBACCO EDUCATION PROGRAMS FUND TO THE
PRESCHOOL PROGRAMS CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 26.5-4-209 (1)(a)
TEN MILLION DOLLARS OF MONEY THAT ORIGINATED FROM THE 2020 TAX
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

HOLDING FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-22-118.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(c)(V) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JUNE 30,
2028.
SECTION 2. Appropriation - adjustments to 2026 long bill.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to implement this
act, the general fund appropriation made in the annual general appropriation
act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department of early childhood for
the universal preschool program is decreased by $10,000,000.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not require a reduction of an
appropriation in the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state
fiscal year if:
(a) The amount of the general fund appropriation made in the annual
general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year to the department
of early childhood for the universal preschool program is less than the
amount of the adjustment required in subsection (1) of this section; or
(b) The annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal
year does not include an appropriation to the department of early childhood
for the universal preschool program.
(3) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $10,000,000 is appropriated to
the department of early childhood. This appropriation is from the preschool
programs cash fund created in section 26.5-4-209 (1)(a), C.R.S. To
implement this act, the department may use this appropriation for the
universal preschool program.
SECTION 3. Effective date. This act takes effect upon passage;
except that subsections (1) and (2) of section 2 of this act take effect only
if the annual general appropriation act for the 2026-27 state fiscal year
becomes law, in which case subsections (1) and (2) of section 2 of this act
take effect upon the effective date of this act or of the annual general
appropriation act for state fiscal year 2026-27, whichever is later.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1404

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1404